West Virginia, session 2025, SB404.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Respiratory Care. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 30, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-34-6 of this code, relating to the Board of Respiratory Care (criteria for licensure, 30 CSR 01), is authorized with the amendments set forth below: On page 1, subsection 2.4 by deleting the subsection in its entirety. 	And,	On page 1, paragraph 3.1.2., by striking out the words "On or after July 1, 2022 holds" and inserting in lieu thereof the word "Holds".	And,	 On page 1, paragraph 3.1.3., by striking out the words "Prior to July 1, 2022 holds" and inserting in lieu thereof the word "Holds".	And,	On page 2, subsection 3.3, by deleting the subsection in its entirety.	And,	On page 2, subsection 4.1, after the words "Respiratory therapists" by striking out the words "licensed prior to July 1, 2022,".	And,	On page 2, subsection 4.2, by striking out the subsection in its entirety.